Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article VI Legislative Apportionment

Section 1. House Districts.

Members of the house of representatives shall be elected by the qualified voters of the respective house districts. The boundaries of the house districts shall be set under this article following the official reporting of each decennial census of the United States.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), substituted “house districts” for “election districts” in the first sentence and rewrote the second sentence, which read: “Until reapportionment, election districts and the number of representatives to be elected from each district shall be as set forth in Section 1 of Article XIV.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature may not break election districts down into wards or subdistricts. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

Section 2. Senate Districts.

Members of the senate shall be elected by the qualified voters of the respective senate districts. The boundaries of the senate districts shall be set under this article following the official reporting of each decennial census of the United States.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), rewrote the second sentence, which read: “Senate districts shall be as set forth in Section 2 of Article XIV, subject to changes authorized in this article.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

A court could declare Alaska’s entire legislative apportionment system unconstitutional on the ground that the senate’s apportionment was invalid whether or not the house was validly apportioned. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

Section 3. Reapportionment of House and Senate.

The Redistricting Board shall reapportion the house of representatives and the senate immediately following the official reporting of each decennial census of the United States. Reapportionment shall be based upon the population within each house and senate district as reported by the official decennial census of the United States.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), substituted “Redistricting Board” for “governor” and inserted “and the senate” in the first sentence; substituted “the population within each house and senate district as reported by the official decennial census of the United States” for “civilian population within each election district as reported by the census” in the second sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When a concentrated area of population, not having a sufficient population to become a district in itself, prefers to be transferred to its adjacent district within the local senate district, the transfer is possible under the constitution, provided that all constitutional requirements for redistricting are met. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

The drafters of the constitution put reapportionment in the hands of the governor, acting on the advice of a reapportionment board, and specifically rejected the idea of giving reapportionment to the legislature. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

The Alaska constitutional convention reports and minutes indicate that the delegates who drafted this article gave the duty of reapportioning to the governor for one reason: a legislature cannot and should not be expected to properly reapportion itself. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

Alaska Const., art. VI, § 4, provides that the house will be apportioned on the “method of equal proportions,” which is a population-based method widely used in reapportionment of Congressional districts. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

Section 4. Method of Redistricting.

The Redistricting Board shall establish forty house districts, with each house district to elect one member of the house of representatives. The board shall establish twenty senate districts, each composed of two house districts, with each senate district to elect one senator.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), rewrote this section, which read: “Reapportionment shall be by the method of equal proportions, except that each election district having the major fraction of the quotient obtained by dividing
total civilian population by forty shall have one representative.”

Editor’s notes. —

The amendments proposed by 2010 Legislative Resolve 53 (SJR 21 am H) (number of house and senate districts) were rejected by voters.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section applies equally to all present and future election districts without any restriction to the original districts. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

Section 5. [Repealed].

[Repealed by 1998 Ballot Measure No. 3 (1998 Legislative Resolve 74; 20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)).]

Section 6. District Boundaries.

The Redistricting Board shall establish the size and area of house districts, subject to the limitations of this article. Each house district shall be formed of contiguous and compact territory containing as nearly as practicable a relatively integrated socio-economic area. Each shall contain a population as near as practicable to the quotient obtained by dividing the population of the state by forty. Each senate district shall be composed as near as practicable of two contiguous house districts. Consideration may be given to local government boundaries. Drainage and other geographic features shall be used in describing boundaries wherever possible.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), substituted “The Redistricting Board shall establish the size and area of house districts” for “The governor may further redistrict by changing the size and area of election districts” at the beginning of the first sentence; substituted “Each house district” for “Each new district so created” at the beginning of the second sentence; in the third sentence substituted “as nearly as practicable” for “at least equal” and “the population of the state” for “the total civilian population”; and added the fourth sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendment proposed by 2010 Legislative Resolve 53 (SJR 21 am H) (number of house and senate districts) was rejected by voters

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Advisory Reapportionment Board may always divide a district into smaller districts provided the requirements laid down in this section are complied with. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

Section 7. [Repealed].

[Repealed by 1998 Ballot Measure No. 3 (1998 Legislative Resolve 74; 20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)).]

Section 8. Redistricting Board.

There shall be a redistricting board. It shall consist of five members, all of whom shall be residents of the state for at least one year and none of whom may be public employees or officials at the time of or during the tenure of appointment. Appointments shall be made without regard to political affiliation. Board members shall be compensated.

Members of the Redistricting Board shall be appointed in the year in which an official decennial census of the United States is taken and by September 1 of that year. The governor shall appoint two members of the board. The presiding officer of the senate, the presiding officer of the house of representatives, and the chief justice of the supreme court shall each appoint one member of the board. The appointments to the board shall be made in the order listed in this subsection. At least one board member shall be a resident of each judicial district that existed on January 1, 1999. Board members serve until a final plan for redistricting and proclamation of redistricting has been adopted and all challenges to it brought under Section 11 of this article have been resolved after final remand or affirmation.

A person who was a member of the Redistricting Board at any time during the process leading to final adoption of a redistricting plan under Section 10 of this article may not be a candidate for the legislature in the general election following the adoption of the final redistricting plan.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), rewrote this section, which read: “The governor shall appoint a reapportionment board to act in an advisory capacity to him. It shall consist of five members, none of whom may be public employees or officials. At least one member each shall be appointed from the Southeastern, Southcentral, Central, and Northwestern Senate Districts. Appointments shall be made without regard to political affiliation. Board members shall be compensated.”

Section 9. Board Actions.

The board shall elect one of its members chairman and may employ temporary assistants. Concurrence of three members of the Redistricting Board is required for actions of the Board, but a lesser number may conduct hearings. The board shall employ or contract for services of independent legal counsel.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)) rewrote this section, which read: “The board shall elect one of its members chairman and may employ temporary assistants. Concurrence of three members is required for a ruling or determination, but a lesser number may conduct hearings or otherwise act for the board.”

Section 10. Redistricting Plan and Proclamation.

Within thirty days after the official reporting of the decennial census of the United States or thirty days after being duly appointed, whichever occurs last, the board shall adopt one or more proposed redistricting plans. The board shall hold public hearings on the proposed plan, or, if no single proposed plan is agreed on, on all plans proposed by the board. No later than ninety days after the board has been appointed and the official reporting of the decennial census of the United States, the board shall adopt a final redistricting plan and issue a proclamation of redistricting. The final plan shall set out boundaries of house and senate districts and shall be effective for the election of members of the legislature until after the official reporting of the next decennial census of the United States.

Adoption of a final redistricting plan shall require the affirmative votes of three members of the Redistricting Board.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), rewrote this section, which read: “Within ninety days following the official reporting of each decennial census, the board shall submit to the governor a plan for reapportionment and redistricting as provided in this article. Within ninety days after receipt of the plan, the governor shall issue a proclamation of reapportionment and redistricting. An accompanying statement shall explain any change from the plan of the board. The reapportionment and redistricting shall be effective for the election of members of the legislature until after the official reporting of the next decennial census.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section’s mandate that 1960’s reapportionment plan remain in effect until 1970 had to give way to the United States supreme court’s rulings on reapportionment. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4 (issued prior to 1998 amendment).

Section 11. Enforcement.

Any qualified voter may apply to the superior court to compel the Redistricting Board, by mandamus or otherwise, to perform its duties under this article or to correct any error in redistricting. Application to compel the board to perform must be filed not later than thirty days following the expiration of the ninety-day period specified in this article. Application to compel correction of any error in redistricting must be filed within thirty days following the adoption of the final redistricting plan and proclamation by the board. Original jurisdiction in these matters is vested in the superior court. On appeal from the superior court, the cause shall be reviewed by the supreme court on the law and the facts. Notwithstanding Section 15 of Article IV, all dispositions by the superior court and the supreme court under this section shall be expedited and shall have priority over all other matters pending before the respective court. Upon a final judicial decision that a plan is invalid, the matter shall be returned to the board for correction and development of a new plan. If that new plan is declared invalid, the matter may be referred again to the board.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), rewrote this section, which read: “Any qualified voter may apply to the superior court to compel the governor, by mandamus or otherwise, to perform his reapportionment duties or to correct any error in redistricting or reapportionment. Application to compel the governor to perform his reapportionment duties must be filed within thirty days of the expiration of either of the two ninety-day periods specified in this article. Application to compel correction of any error in redistricting or reapportionment must be filed within thirty days following the proclamation. Original jurisdiction in these matters is hereby vested in the superior court. On appeal, the cause shall be reviewed by the supreme court upon the law and the facts.”